Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.220

Database of notaries public.

The director shall maintain an electronic database of notaries public:

(1) Through which a person may verify the authority of a notary public to perform notarial acts; and

(2) Which indicates whether a notary public has notified the director that the notary public will be performing notarial acts on electronic records.

[ 2017 c 281 s 24.]